Maryland, session 2025, HB0510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–108.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED
UNDER § 13–1304(B)(2) OR (3) OF THIS ARTICLE CONDUCTING A GAMING EVENT FOR
ITS OWN BENEFIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–1304 OF THIS ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0510*

HOUSE BILL 510
(B) An organization that operates a gaming event authorized under this subtitle,
Subtitle 2 of this title, or Title 13 of this article may not accept credit from a person to allow
that person to play a gaming device at the gaming event.
[(b)] (C) Subsection [(a)] (B) of this section does not prohibit an organization
from accepting a token instead of money from a person who has paid the organization
money for the use of the token.
[(c)] (D) An organization that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or loss of privileges to conduct a
gaming event not exceeding 60 days or both.
13–1304.
(b) An organization may conduct a gaming event for its own benefit if the
organization is:
(2) a Frederick County volunteer:
(i) fire company;
(ii) rescue company; or
(iii) ambulance company; or
(3) an auxiliary for a Frederick County volunteer:
(i) fire company;
(ii) rescue company; or
(iii) ambulance company.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.